

	DCP Midstream - Home























































Committed to our Communities




Committed to our Investors




COMMITTED to DCP 2020




COMMITTED to operational excellence




COMMITTED to our people








 AT DCP MIDSTREAM,
WE ARE AN ENERGY COMPANY THAT CONNECTS RESOURCES TO END-USE MARKETS. WE LEVERAGE OUR STRATEGIC FOOTPRINT OF ASSETS AND ARE A LEADING FULL-SERVICE MIDSTREAM LOGISTICS PROVIDER.






CompanyIndustry-leading footprint of integrated natural gas gathering and processing and downstream assets.
LEARN MORE





Investors
Executive Management, Board of Directors, events, and presentations.
LEARN MORE





Safety & Sustainability
Committed to operating reliably and safely.
LEARN MORE





Careers
Essential to the country’s energy needs.
LEARN MORE













IN THE NEWSAir Force pilot from Franktown named FOX31 Hero of the Month

READ STORY







CareersGet to know our culture and learn more about our competitive benefits.

Join Us







Explore DCP's FootprintView our assets with our interactive map.

Explore Map








Midstream 101Learn the industry basics and our role in it.

Start Here
































	DCP Midstream - Contact Us

















































Contact Us






24-HOUR EMERGENCY NUMBERS
(888) 204-1781 - For all emergencies
(800) 435-1679 - Hazardous liquid emergency number

 
Headquarters
370 17th Street
Suite 2500
Denver, CO 80202
(303) 595-3331
































	DCP Midstream - Careers



















































Careers






Why Work at DCP
At DCP, all our employees are committed to operational excellence in everything we do. Founded on the principles of reliability, risk management, and efficiency, and guided by our behaviors of discipline, managerial courage, and accountability, we are an essential contributor to the country’s need for energy.

Search Opportunities
 

Development
 DCP Midstream offers continuous developmental opportunities ranging from individual development plans, rotational programs, tuition reimbursement and a focused effort on succession planning. Your development plan is custom tailored to fit what you want to do. 
 
Competitive Compensation and Benefits
 We offer an outstanding 401K match, tuition reimbursement, parental leave, employee-matching charitable gifts program, and more. We have a strong focus on your personal and family's well-being. 
 
Craft Positions
We are an operations-led company focused on the safe, reliable and efficient operations of our assets. Some of the positions we hire for include mechanics, field operators, plant operators, or electrical/instrumentation technicians.
 
Professional Positions
At DCP, all roles contribute to our operations running safely and reliably. While professional roles primarily reside in our Denver headquarters, we also may have a need for these positions in our regional Houston office. Positions may include roles in engineering; environment, health and safety; finance and accounting; supply chain; or information technology.
 
College Recruiting
Are you about to graduate and looking for your first position? You have something to contribute. With DCP Midstream, you’ve found the right place to do it. We have dedicated programs created specifically to developing new employees, including Leadership Excellence Acceleration Program (LEAP). LEAP offers MBA students with industry experience a three-year rotational development experience to learn our business. We also have an internal LEAP program offering rotations in operations and engineering. For more information, please contact Janie Sayavong at (303) 446-4165 or JSayavong@dcpmidstream.com. 
 
Honoring Veterans: Your Skills Fit Our Jobs
DCP Midstream is proud to serve those who proudly serve us. That’s why DCP started Operation Next, a program that helps veterans return to the civilian workforce through counseling and job training efforts.

You served our country with honor. Now you can serve with distinction again by helping us ensure our nation has the energy infrastructure it needs to thrive and grow. We need your discipline, focus, capabilities and integrity to operate our assets across the country.

Search our job openings for opportunities that best match your skills.
 
Equal Employment Opportunity
DCP Midstream is committed to diversity and makes employment decisions based on valid requirements, without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, veteran status, disability, or other legally protected status. In keeping with this commitment, DCP Midstream endeavors to make its career website accessible to all potential applicants. For information regarding the accessibility of our career website, including possible accommodations if you cannot apply online, please contact talentacquisition@dcpmidstream.com. Please note that only inquiries regarding accessibility of the website should be directed here. DCP Midstream is a drug-free workplace and participates in the E-Verify Program in our hiring practices to achieve a lawful workforce.
 




                    

DCP Midstream Careers







IN THE NEWSAir Force pilot from Franktown named FOX31 Hero of the Month
READ STORY




Midstream 101Learn the industry basics and our role in it.
START HERE




Explore DCP's FootprintView our assets with our interactive map.
EXPLORE MAP


































	DCP Midstream - Login

















































Login









Customers
Click here to access
DCP Midstream's customer
portal environment.
Customer Login




Career Seekers
If you are ready to apply for a job or looking for the status of a submitted application, click here to log in to our career seeker site.
Career Seeker Login




Suppliers
Click here to access
DCP Midstream’s supplier
portal environment.
Supplier Login

































            DCP Midstream Partners - Investors - Investor OverviewINVESTORSWebcastQ2 2017 DCP Midstream, LP Earnings Conference Call   (Live)08/07/17 at 12:00 p.m. MTQ2 2017 DCP Midstream, LP Earnings Conference Call  Monday, August 7, 2017 12:00 p.m. MT  Webcast Presentation HelpClick here for webcastAdd to Calendar Help Javascript must be enabled to use this feature
                     Click here to add this event to your calendarDCP 2016 K-1s will be available to download via the  TAX REPORTING PACKAGE 
link beginning Monday, February 27 and will be mailed that same week Corporate ProfileDCP Midstream, LP (NYSE: DCP) is a midstream master limited partnership, with a diversified portfolio of assets, engaged in the business of gathering, compressing, treating, processing, transporting, storing and selling natural gas; producing, fractionating, transporting, storing and selling NGLs and recovering and selling condensate. DCP owns and operates more than 60 plants and 64,000 miles of natural gas and natural gas liquids pipelines, with operations in 17 states across major producing regions and leads the midstream segment as the largest natural gas liquids producer, the largest natural gas processor and one of the largest marketers in the U.S. Denver, Colorado based DCP is managed by its general partner, DCP Midstream GP, LP, which is managed by its general partner, DCP Midstream GP, LLC, which is 100% owned by DCP Midstream, LLC. DCP Midstream, LLC is a joint venture between Phillips 66 and Enbridge.Stock Quote
DCP (Common Stock)
			  ExchangeNYSEPrice$34.57Change  0.02 (0.06%)Volume296,841Data as of 07/24/17 4:00 p.m. ETRefresh quoteRecent PresentationsMore >> 2017 MLPA Investor ConferenceRecent NewsMore >>DateTitle  07/24/17DCP Midstream Announces Quarterly DistributionDENVER, July  24, 2017  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- DCP Midstream, LP (NYSE:DCP) announced today that the board of directors of its general partner declared a quarterly cash distribution of $0.78 per common unit for the quarter ended June 30, 2017, or $3.12 per unit on an annualized basis, which remains unchanged from the previous quarter. This quarterly cash distribution will be paid August 14, 2017 to unitholders of record at the close of business on August 8, 2017.


  
    INVESTOR RELATIONS:
 ...  07/13/17DCP Midstream to Release Second Quarter 2017 Financial Results on August 7DENVER, July  13, 2017  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- DCP Midstream, LP (NYSE:DCP) will announce its second quarter 2017 earnings before the New York Stock Exchange opens for trading on Monday, August 7, 2017, and will host a conference call and webcast at 2:00 p.m. ET that same day to discuss quarterly results.

The live audio webcast of the conference call and presentation slides can be accessed through the Investors section on the DCP website at www.dcpmidstream.com and the conference call can be acc...  05/30/17DCP Midstream Announces Additional Large Scale Expansion of Sand Hills Natural Gas Liquids PipelineDENVER, May  30, 2017  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- DCP Midstream, LP (NYSE:DCP) today announced an additional large scale expansion of the Sand Hills natural gas liquids (NGL) pipeline, with plans to initially spend $105 million towards long-lead equipment and right-of-way. In a phased approach, this expansion is designed to first increase capacity by 85 thousand barrels per day (MBpd) up to approximately 450 MBpd. This initial phase, when completed, is anticipated to include partial looping of the pipe...  05/24/17DCP Midstream to Participate in MLPA Investor ConferenceDENVER, May  24, 2017  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- DCP Midstream, LP (NYSE:DCP) announced that Wouter van Kempen, chairman, president and chief executive officer, and Sean O’Brien, group vice president and chief financial officer, will conduct a series of one-on-one and small group meetings with investment community representatives at the 2017 Annual MLPA Investor Conference in Orlando, Florida on May 31, 2017 and June 1, 2017.

The materials used at this conference will be posted on the Investors sec...  Upcoming EventsMore >>DateTitle08/07/17 12:00 p.m. MTQ2 2017 DCP Midstream, LP Earnings Conference Call  Annual Reports 2016 Annual Report and 10-K 					Receive Email Alerts Sign up to receive email alerts whenever DCP Midstream, LP posts new information to the site. Just enter your email address and click Submit.







                     Contact InformationDCP Midstream Partners, LP370 17th StreetSuite 2500Denver, CO 80202Phone: 303-595-3331Investor Relations InquiriesAndrea AttelDirector - Investor RelationsPhone: 303-605-1741Email: arattel@dcpmidstream.com
Data provided by Nasdaq.  Minimum 15 minutes delayed.

	DCP Midstream - Company

















































Our Company






We are a must-run business, with a proven track record as an industry leader for almost 90 years.
DCP Midstream is one of the largest producers of NGLs and one of the largest natural gas processing companies in the U.S. We gather and/or process about 12 percent of our nation’s gas supply.

Leading Industry Footprint
We have a competitive footprint and strong geographic diversity with leading positions in key economic-producing basins where producers are focused, including the DJ Basin, the Permian Basin, and the STACK/SCOOP areas of the Midcontinent.

We provide natural gas gathering services to the wellhead, and we’re leveraging our strategic footprint to extend the value chain through our integrated NGL pipelines and other marketing and logistics infrastructure. 

Committed to Sustainability
Through our DCP 2020 framework, DCP is committed to being sustainable in any market environment, with a focus on operational excellence, including industry-leading safety performance.





IN THE NEWSAir Force pilot from Franktown named FOX31 Hero of the Month
READ STORY




Midstream 101Learn the industry basics and our role in it.
START HERE




Explore DCP's FootprintView our assets with our interactive map.
EXPLORE MAP



































	DCP Midstream - Midstream 101

















































Midstream 101






Company > Midstream 101





What Is the Midstream Industry?

Most natural gas in the U.S. must be processed before it reaches the marketplace (companies) and end-users (people like you). Midstream is the link between natural gas being produced at a wellhead and then filling society’s need for energy and by-products.

Where do we fit in? If you take a hot shower, heat your home or use anything made from rubber, plastics or synthetics, we were part of providing it. If you save on heating or cooling costs through home insulation, we help make it possible. If you have cables running through your home or office, you benefit from the energy we provide.



What Exactly Is Natural Gas?

Like oil and coal, natural gas is a fossil fuel. Twenty-five percent of the energy consumed in the U.S. is natural gas, making it the second-largest source of energy; and that’s growing.
 
It is colorless, shapeless, odorless and tasteless. When burned, natural gas creates a great deal of energy ― but with few emissions.



Why and How Is It Processed?

Raw natural gas is processed to ensure it meets quality regulations, is safe to use, and to make it a useful and marketable product for society.

It’s also processed to extract valuable liquids. These liquids are called natural gas liquids (NGLs). They include ethane, propane and butane. Companies use NGLs to produce products containing rubber, plastics or synthetics.

After processing, our trucks transport NGLs to a facility where NGLs are fractionated into other compounds.



What Type of Plants Does DCP Have? 

Our plants are centralized processing facilities, located near or within major production fields. They process raw natural gas turning it into pipeline-quality residue gas, treating it to remove contaminants or impurities and creating valuable NGLs.

Several types of natural gas processing plants are used throughout the industry to produce pipeline quality "dry" gas. The type of plant and technology used is greatly dependent upon the geologic nature of the gas being processed.  In addition to centralized plants which process gas near the source of production, there are specialized plants.

Sweetening and Treating Plants
Specifically designed to remove large quantities of sulfur and carbon dioxide and other impurities from an otherwise dry natural gas stream.

Straddle Plants
In addition to processing done at the wellhead and at centralized processing plants, processing is also accomplished at straddle extraction plants. Straddle plants are located on interstate or intrastate pipelines that carry pipeline quality gas.

Fractionation Plants
The majority of NGLs are sent downstream to be fractionated into their individual components at specialized plants.



What Is Fractionation? 

Fractionation results in the separation of NGLs into their individual components. It’s based on the different boiling points of the individual hydrocarbons in the NGL stream. From the lightest to the heaviest, the NGLs are passed through a series of distillation towers named for the extracted hydrocarbon: ethane, propane and butane.

These hydrocarbons are then provided to locations where gas gets traded. Several of the market hubs are located at DCP facilities, including Spindletop Storage Hub and the Carthage Hub, part of our East Texas system.



How Is It Transported?

As gas moves through the different processing phases, it’s compressed and expanded as needed. Once the gas has been fully processed and is ready to leave the plant, it’s re-compressed in a residue compressor to achieve sufficient pressure to be sent from the plant outlet to a mainline transmission pipeline.



Is This Process Safe? 

Pipelines provide the safest method of transportation for natural gas and NGLs. The U.S. Department of Transportation’s records show pipelines consistently have the highest safety record among all major fuel transportation systems.
 
Safety is our core value. We adhere to the strictest safety regulations. We monitor our pipelines 24 hours a day and conduct regular inspections, routine tests and equipment maintenance. We also train our employees and all local emergency service providers to ensure response preparedness in the unlikely event of an emergency.
 
But, it is important to remember that you can do your part, too, by practicing safe digging. Always call 811 before you dig. It’s the only way to know what’s below.




































DCP Midstream Partners, LP Tax Package Support































            DCP Midstream Partners - Investors - News ReleaseINVESTORSNews Release<< Back View printer-friendly versionDCP Midstream, LLC and DCP Midstream Partners, LP Combine to Form the Largest NGL Producer and Gas Processor in the U.S. with an Enterprise Value of $11 Billion, and Announces Multiple New Growth ProjectsDENVER, Jan.  04, 2017  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- DCP Midstream, LLC (Midstream), a 50/50 joint venture between Phillips 66 and Spectra Energy (Owners), and DCP Midstream Partners, LP (NYSE:DPM), today announced that they have signed and closed a transaction combining all of the assets and debt of Midstream with DPM (Transaction), simplifying the corporate structure and creating the largest natural gas liquids (NGL) producer and gas processor in the United States. On January 23, 2017, the combined company will be renamed DCP Midstream, LP and the New York Stock Exchange stock ticker symbol will be changed to “DCP”.
Transaction Summary
Under terms of the Transaction, Midstream has contributed subsidiaries owning all of its assets to DPM, plus $424 million of cash, in exchange for approximately 31.1 million DPM units ($1.125 billion) and DPM assuming $3.15 billion of Midstream debt, for an estimated transaction multiple of approximately eight times based on current commodity strip prices. The cash proceeds of $424 million contributed to DPM will be used to repay its revolver, fund its growth projects or prefund repayment of DPM debt maturing in December 2017. The Owners have retained their 50/50 joint ownership of DCP Midstream, LLC, which owns the incentive distribution rights (IDRs) and 38 percent of the outstanding DPM general and limited partner units. The terms of the Transaction were unanimously approved by the Board of Directors of DCP Midstream and DCP Midstream Partners based on the unanimous approval and recommendation of the Conflicts Committee, which is comprised of independent directors.
“This transformational transaction provides a platform of premier assets with strong growth opportunities in the key U.S. producing basins at a multiple that paves the way towards future distribution growth,” said Wouter van Kempen, chairman, president and CEO of both DCP Midstream and DCP Midstream Partners. "The transaction benefits both our unitholders and our Owners with a simplified structure and is the logical progression following our successful DCP 2020 strategy execution to date. We’ve added fee-based margins, sold non-core assets, strengthened Midstream’s balance sheet and reset the overall cost structure of the DCP enterprise to make the assets more MLP-friendly."
"Our combined diversified portfolio provides highly accretive bolt-on expansion opportunities starting with the DJ Basin, where we will build a new 200 million-cubic-feet-per-day (MMcf/d) processing plant that is expected to come online in late 2018 with an additional 200 MMcf/d plant in 2019, resulting in a 50 percent increase in DJ Basin capacity. Additionally, we are expanding our Sand Hills NGL pipeline to its full 365 thousand barrels per day (BPD) of capacity by the end of 2017, an increase of 30 percent," added van Kempen. “Our teams have done great work with key producers to create accretive organic growth projects in the DJ and Delaware Basins.”
Compelling Value Proposition

Creates largest NGL producer and gas processor in the U.S.: The combination creates the largest gathering and processing Master Limited Partnership in the United States with a pro-forma enterprise value of approximately $11 billion.
Win-win combination is immediately accretive and provides strong alignment between GP and LP unitholders: The Transaction is projected to be distributable cash flow (DCF) accretive to DPM unitholders at current strip prices. Expected strong returns from organic growth projects, combined with a sustained improvement in the industry environment, will provide DPM with a path to future distribution growth for both the Owners and LP unitholders.
Strong growth platform: The combination of legacy integrated footprints brings together DPM’s existing assets with Midstream’s premier assets in the Delaware and Permian Basins, the DJ Basin and the Midcontinent, as well as an additional one-third interest in both Sand Hills and Southern Hills NGL pipelines. As the largest NGL producer and gas processor, the newly combined DPM has a footprint that creates a strong, long-term platform for organic growth opportunities in the premier basins in the U.S., starting with expansion projects in the DJ Basin and on Sand Hills Pipeline.
Strong Owner alignment and support: The Transaction increases Phillips 66 and Spectra Energy’s ownership in DPM to 38 percent allowing owners greater participation in increased earnings from future growth opportunities at the MLP. To support a minimum 1.0 times distribution coverage ratio, the Owners have agreed, if required, to provide IDR givebacks up to $100 million annually through 2019 which provides downside protection for LP unitholders.
Enhanced upside potential coupled with fee-based cash flows: The DCP 2020 strategy has reset the combined company with cost reductions, improved asset reliability and increased fee-based earnings. In 2017, 70 percent of the pro-forma margin is either fee-based or hedged, providing downside protection while preserving upside potential in an improving commodity environment.

Significant Expansion Projects Announced in the DJ Basin and on Sand Hills Pipeline
DJ Basin ExpansionDPM will construct a new 200 MMcf/d cryogenic natural gas processing plant (Mewbourn 3) in the DJ Basin, its tenth plant in the basin, projected to be in service by the end of 2018. Additionally, DCP collaborated with several key producers to form a cooperative development plan which provides a framework to add another 200 MMcf/d plant by mid-2019. Together, these projects will increase capacity by 50 percent to 1.2 billion cubic feet per day to support growing processing needs of producers. DPM will also complete the next phase of its Grand Parkway low pressure gathering project and associated compression expansions by the end of 2018.
DPM is in the process of constructing additional field compression and plant bypass infrastructure that will add approximately 40 MMcf/d of incremental capacity during the summer of 2017. The new plants will connect to the Front Range Pipeline, one-third owned by DPM, for NGL takeaway to Mont Belvieu, Texas. Total capital investment for the plant and associated gathering is expected to be up to $395 million.
Sand Hills Pipeline ExpansionDPM will expand NGL takeaway capacity on Sand Hills Pipeline by 30 percent, or 85,000 barrels per day (BPD) to 365,000 BPD, through the addition of four pump stations and a pipeline loop (Sand Hills expansion) to meet NGL production growth from owned and third party plants in the Delaware Basin. Total capital investment for the Sand Hills expansion is approximately $70 million, with an expected in-service date in the fourth quarter of 2017. The newly combined DPM owns two-thirds interest in Sand Hills and Phillips 66 Partners owns the remaining one-third interest and each will fund their proportionate share of the expansion.
Sand Hills provides NGL takeaway capacity to the Mont Belvieu market from both owned and third party plants in the growing Permian Basin, including Southeast New Mexico, Delaware Basin, and Cline Shale of West Texas.
Transaction Advisors 
BofA Merrill Lynch acted as financial advisor, Bracewell acted as legal counsel and Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher acted as special tax counsel to DCP Midstream, LLC. Evercore acted as financial advisor and Andrews Kurth Kenyon and Richards, Layton & Finger acted as legal counsel to the Conflicts Committee of DPM’s Board of Directors.
Conference Call Details 
Please join DCP Midstream Partners today, January 4, at 9:00 a.m. Eastern Time for a live webcast conference call to discuss the Transaction and the combined company’s 2017 pro forma guidance and growth projects. The conference call will be presented by Wouter van Kempen, chairman, president and chief executive officer, and Sean O’Brien, chief financial officer, followed by a question and answer period for investment analysts.
Analysts, members of the media and other interested parties can access the live audio webcast of the conference call and presentation slides through the Investors section of DCP Midstream Partners’ website at www.dcppartners.com and call by dialing (844) 233-0113 in the United States or (574) 990-1008 outside the United States. The conference confirmation number is 46976915. Please call in five to 10 minutes prior to the scheduled start time. A replay of the conference call will be available by dialing (855) 859-2056 in the United States or (404) 537-3406 outside the United States. The replay conference confirmation number is 46976915. An audio webcast replay and presentation slides and transcript in PDF format will also be available by accessing the Investors section of the partnership’s website at www.dcppartners.com.


MEDIA RELATIONS:
Roz Elliott


Phone:
303-605-1707


INVESTOR RELATIONS:
Andrea Attel


Phone:
303-605-1741


 
 


ABOUT DCP MIDSTREAM PARTNERS, LPDCP Midstream Partners, LP (NYSE:DPM) is a midstream master limited partnership engaged in the business of gathering, compressing, treating, processing, transporting, storing and selling natural gas; producing, fractionating, transporting, storing and selling NGLs and recovering and selling condensate; and transporting, storing and selling propane in wholesale markets. DPM operates in 17 states across major producing regions and leads the midstream segment as the largest natural gas processor, the largest natural gas liquids producer and one of the largest marketers in the U.S. DPM is managed by its general partner, DCP Midstream GP, LP, which in turn is managed by its general partner, DCP Midstream GP, LLC, which is 100% owned by DCP Midstream, LLC, a joint venture between Phillips 66 and Spectra Energy. For more information, visit the DCP Midstream Partners, LP website at www.dcppartners.com.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT ABOUT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTSThis press release may contain forward-looking statements as defined under the federal securities laws, including projections, estimates, forecasts, plans, and objectives. Although management believes that expectations reflected in such forward-looking statements are reasonable, no assurance can be given that such expectations will prove to be correct. In addition, these statements are subject to certain risks, uncertainties, and other assumptions that are difficult to predict and may be beyond our control. If one or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or if underlying assumptions prove incorrect, DCP Midstream Partners' actual results may vary materially from what management anticipated, estimated, projected, or expected. Other key risk factors that may have a direct bearing on DCP Midstream Partners' results of operations and financial condition are described in detail in DCP Midstream Partners' periodic reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Investors are encouraged to closely consider the disclosures and risk factors contained in DCP Midstream Partners' reports filed from time to time with the Securities and Exchange Commission. DCP Midstream Partners undertakes no obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise.

DCP Midstream, LP﻿































Q2 2017 Earnings Forecast for DCP Midstream Partners, LP Issued By US Capital Advisors (DCP) - Markets Daily













































 
























 




 





















Daily Ratings & News for DCP Midstream Partners LP
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor DCP Midstream Partners LP with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @TheMarketsDaily


The Markets Daily









Recent Posts

Imperial Capital Research Analysts Reduce Earnings Estimates for CyberArk Software Ltd. (NASDAQ:CYBR)
Q2 2017 Earnings Forecast for DCP Midstream Partners, LP Issued By US Capital Advisors (DCP)
Stuart Chaussee & Associates Inc. Has $111,000 Position in Consolidated Edison Inc (NYSE:ED)
LS Investment Advisors LLC Boosts Position in Kellogg Company (NYSE:K)
Lyon William Homes (NYSE:WLH) Major Shareholder Gmt Capital Corp Sells 16,200 Shares of Stock
Mandatum Life Insurance Co Ltd Holds Position in AutoZone, Inc. (NYSE:AZO)
Kellogg Company (K) Shares Bought by Creative Planning
Bartlett & Co. LLC Has $182,000 Position in Huntington Bancshares Incorporated (HBAN)
Breton Hill Capital Ltd. Buys New Stake in Intel Corporation (INTC)
CrestPoint Capital Management LLC Lowers Stake in Procter & Gamble Company (The) (PG)
48,700 Shares in Norfolk Souther Corporation (NYSE:NSC) Acquired by Sentry Investments Corp.
Intellia Therapeutics, Inc. (NASDAQ:NTLA) Rating Reiterated by Cann
Netflix, Inc. (NFLX) Given Buy Rating at Bank of America Corporation
Netflix, Inc. (NFLX) Price Target Raised to $180.00 at Citigroup Inc.
EOG Resources, Inc. (NYSE:EOG) Shares Sold by Bartlett & Co. LLC
Impax Laboratories, Inc. (NASDAQ:IPXL) PT Set at $21.00 by Deutsche Bank AG
Morse Asset Management Inc Invests $693,000 in Honeywell International Inc. (HON)
21,374 Shares in Target Corporation (NYSE:TGT) Acquired by LMR Partners LLP
The Kraft Heinz Company (NASDAQ:KHC) Shares Sold by KBC Group NV
Hospitality Properties Trust (HPT) Shares Sold by Tudor Investment Corp ET AL




 


Q2 2017 Earnings Forecast for DCP Midstream Partners, LP Issued By US Capital Advisors (DCP)

					Posted by Danessa Lincoln on Jul 19th, 2017 // No Comments 





DCP Midstream Partners, LP (NYSE:DCP) – Analysts at  US Capital Advisors decreased their Q2 2017 EPS estimates for DCP Midstream Partners,  in a research note issued on  Monday. US Capital Advisors analyst B. Followill now expects that the pipeline company will post earnings per share of $0.02 for the quarter, down from their prior estimate of $0.09. US Capital Advisors  has a “Overweight” rating on the stock. 


 Get DCP Midstream Partners LP alerts:



Separately, Zacks Investment Research lowered shares of DCP Midstream Partners, from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research report on Tuesday. Two equities research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, five have assigned  a hold rating and five have given a buy rating to the stock. The stock  has an average rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $40.00.




ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: “Q2 2017 Earnings Forecast for DCP Midstream Partners, LP Issued By US Capital Advisors (DCP)” was originally  reported by Markets Daily and is the property of of Markets Daily. If you are accessing this news story on another website, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of US & international copyright & trademark law. The legal version of this news story can be read at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/19/q2-2017-earnings-forecast-for-dcp-midstream-partners-lp-issued-by-us-capital-advisors-dcp.html. 
DCP Midstream Partners, (DCP) opened at 35.62 on Wednesday. DCP Midstream Partners, has a 52-week low of $29.70 and a 52-week high of $42.45. The company has a 50-day moving average of $33.26 and a 200 day moving average of $36.92. The company has a market cap of $5.10 billion, a PE ratio of 21.13 and a beta of 2.10. 
DCP Midstream Partners, (NYSE:DCP) last posted its quarterly earnings data on Wednesday, May 10th. The pipeline company reported $0.41 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $0.31 by $0.10. DCP Midstream Partners, had a net margin of 10.53% and a return on equity of 8.15%. The firm had revenue of $2.12 billion during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $613.40 million. During the same quarter in the previous year, the company posted $0.36 EPS. DCP Midstream Partners,’s revenue was up 44.9% on a year-over-year basis. 
DCP Midstream Partners, Company Profile
DCP Midstream, LP, formerly DCP Midstream Partners, LP, is a producer and marketer of natural gas liquids (NGLs) in the United States. The Company is engaged in the business of gathering, compressing, treating, processing, transporting, storing and selling natural gas; producing, fractionating, transporting, storing and selling NGLs and recovering, and selling condensate, and transporting, storing and selling propane in wholesale markets. 







Receive News & Ratings for DCP Midstream Partners LP Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for DCP Midstream Partners LP and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





























Latest News






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website


























































﻿































Q2 2017 Earnings Forecast for DCP Midstream Partners, LP Issued By US Capital Advisors (DCP) - Markets Daily













































 
























 




 





















Daily Ratings & News for DCP Midstream Partners LP
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor DCP Midstream Partners LP with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @TheMarketsDaily


The Markets Daily









Recent Posts

Imperial Capital Research Analysts Reduce Earnings Estimates for CyberArk Software Ltd. (NASDAQ:CYBR)
Q2 2017 Earnings Forecast for DCP Midstream Partners, LP Issued By US Capital Advisors (DCP)
Stuart Chaussee & Associates Inc. Has $111,000 Position in Consolidated Edison Inc (NYSE:ED)
LS Investment Advisors LLC Boosts Position in Kellogg Company (NYSE:K)
Lyon William Homes (NYSE:WLH) Major Shareholder Gmt Capital Corp Sells 16,200 Shares of Stock
Mandatum Life Insurance Co Ltd Holds Position in AutoZone, Inc. (NYSE:AZO)
Kellogg Company (K) Shares Bought by Creative Planning
Bartlett & Co. LLC Has $182,000 Position in Huntington Bancshares Incorporated (HBAN)
Breton Hill Capital Ltd. Buys New Stake in Intel Corporation (INTC)
CrestPoint Capital Management LLC Lowers Stake in Procter & Gamble Company (The) (PG)
48,700 Shares in Norfolk Souther Corporation (NYSE:NSC) Acquired by Sentry Investments Corp.
Intellia Therapeutics, Inc. (NASDAQ:NTLA) Rating Reiterated by Cann
Netflix, Inc. (NFLX) Given Buy Rating at Bank of America Corporation
Netflix, Inc. (NFLX) Price Target Raised to $180.00 at Citigroup Inc.
EOG Resources, Inc. (NYSE:EOG) Shares Sold by Bartlett & Co. LLC
Impax Laboratories, Inc. (NASDAQ:IPXL) PT Set at $21.00 by Deutsche Bank AG
Morse Asset Management Inc Invests $693,000 in Honeywell International Inc. (HON)
21,374 Shares in Target Corporation (NYSE:TGT) Acquired by LMR Partners LLP
The Kraft Heinz Company (NASDAQ:KHC) Shares Sold by KBC Group NV
Hospitality Properties Trust (HPT) Shares Sold by Tudor Investment Corp ET AL




 


Q2 2017 Earnings Forecast for DCP Midstream Partners, LP Issued By US Capital Advisors (DCP)

					Posted by Danessa Lincoln on Jul 19th, 2017 // No Comments 





DCP Midstream Partners, LP (NYSE:DCP) – Analysts at  US Capital Advisors decreased their Q2 2017 EPS estimates for DCP Midstream Partners,  in a research note issued on  Monday. US Capital Advisors analyst B. Followill now expects that the pipeline company will post earnings per share of $0.02 for the quarter, down from their prior estimate of $0.09. US Capital Advisors  has a “Overweight” rating on the stock. 


 Get DCP Midstream Partners LP alerts:



Separately, Zacks Investment Research lowered shares of DCP Midstream Partners, from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research report on Tuesday. Two equities research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, five have assigned  a hold rating and five have given a buy rating to the stock. The stock  has an average rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $40.00.




ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: “Q2 2017 Earnings Forecast for DCP Midstream Partners, LP Issued By US Capital Advisors (DCP)” was originally  reported by Markets Daily and is the property of of Markets Daily. If you are accessing this news story on another website, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of US & international copyright & trademark law. The legal version of this news story can be read at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/19/q2-2017-earnings-forecast-for-dcp-midstream-partners-lp-issued-by-us-capital-advisors-dcp.html. 
DCP Midstream Partners, (DCP) opened at 35.62 on Wednesday. DCP Midstream Partners, has a 52-week low of $29.70 and a 52-week high of $42.45. The company has a 50-day moving average of $33.26 and a 200 day moving average of $36.92. The company has a market cap of $5.10 billion, a PE ratio of 21.13 and a beta of 2.10. 
DCP Midstream Partners, (NYSE:DCP) last posted its quarterly earnings data on Wednesday, May 10th. The pipeline company reported $0.41 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $0.31 by $0.10. DCP Midstream Partners, had a net margin of 10.53% and a return on equity of 8.15%. The firm had revenue of $2.12 billion during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $613.40 million. During the same quarter in the previous year, the company posted $0.36 EPS. DCP Midstream Partners,’s revenue was up 44.9% on a year-over-year basis. 
DCP Midstream Partners, Company Profile
DCP Midstream, LP, formerly DCP Midstream Partners, LP, is a producer and marketer of natural gas liquids (NGLs) in the United States. The Company is engaged in the business of gathering, compressing, treating, processing, transporting, storing and selling natural gas; producing, fractionating, transporting, storing and selling NGLs and recovering, and selling condensate, and transporting, storing and selling propane in wholesale markets. 







Receive News & Ratings for DCP Midstream Partners LP Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for DCP Midstream Partners LP and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





























Latest News






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website




























































Martin Midstream Partners LP































Home » 
Culture&Arts




Martin Midstream Partners LP




				 20 July, 2017,  03:48 | Author: Laverne Higgins			













Magellan Midstream Partners L. now has $16.21B valuation. The stock decreased 0.91% or $0.19 on July 19, reaching $20.58. 243,851 shares of the stock traded hands. It is down 9.69% since July 19, 2016 and is uptrending. It has underperformed by 50.75% the S&P500.On April 29 the stock rating was upgraded from "Neutral" to "Buy" by UBS. Therefore 78% are positive. Carrizo Oil & Gas Inc. had 69 analyst reports since July 21, 2015 according to SRatingsIntel. The stock of Expedia Inc (NASDAQ:EXPE) has "Buy" rating given on Monday, October 24 by Benchmark.01/12/2015 - BMO Capital Markets began new coverage on Rice Midstream Partners LP giving the company a " rating. The company was upgraded on Tuesday, July 18 by Barclays Capital. (NYSE:TSS) earned "Underperform" rating by Credit Suisse on Friday, December 11. They now have $82.00 target price on the pipeline company's stock. BidaskClub raised Martin Midstream Partners L.P. from a "sell" rating to a "hold" rating in a report on Tuesday. Catalyst Capital Advisors LLC now owns 1,568 shares of the pipeline company's stock valued at $121,000 after buying an additional 300 shares in the last quarter. Wells Fargo downgraded the shares of CNNX in report on Monday, January 18 to "Market Perform" rating. Barclays Capital maintained Wolseley plc (LON:WOS) rating on Monday, December 12.Wolseley plc is the holding company of the Wolseley Group of companies. The company has a market capitalization of $2.14 billion, a P/E ratio of 15.38 and a beta of 1.31. The Firm is engaged in the distribution of plumbing and heating products and building materials. The Company's divisions include USA, UK, Nordic, and Canada and Central Europe. Following the acquisition, the insider now directly owns 133,047 shares of the company's stock, valued at $2,402,828.82. Carrizo Oil & Gas Inc (NASDAQ:CRZO) has declined 34.05% since July 19, 2016 and is downtrending.Winslow Evans & Crocker Inc.'s holdings in Martin Midstream Partners L.P. were worth $112,000 at the end of the most recent reporting period. (NYSE:MMP), 9 have Buy rating, 2 Sell and 9 Hold. Therefore 45% are positive. The rating was initiated by Morgan Stanley on Thursday, February 25 with "Equal-Weight". The stock of Expedia Inc (NASDAQ:EXPE) earned "Buy" rating by Cowen & Co on Friday, July 7. The firm has "Hold" rating by Wunderlich given on Wednesday, January 20. The rating was initiated by Johnson Rice on Friday, March 24 with "Accumulate". The company was upgraded on Friday, August 14 by Zacks. The firm has "Hold" rating by Jefferies given on Tuesday, June 6. Benchmark maintained Expedia Inc (NASDAQ:EXPE) on Monday, July 27 with "Buy" rating.Investors sentiment decreased to 0.81 in 2016 Q4. Its down 0.13, from 0.86 in 2016Q3. It improved, as 23 investors sold CRZO shares while 65 reduced holdings. 39 funds opened positions while 99 raised stakes. Oppenheimer upgraded the shares of EXPE in report on Thursday, November 5 to "Outperform" rating. Rice Midstream Partners had a return on equity of 12.79% and a net margin of 58.46%.
K-9 'Endy' Dies After Being Left In Deputy's Hot Patrol Truck
					Because of the ongoing investigation, authorities said they will not have additional comments at this time. The system would give verbal warnings and then activate lights and sirens until the dog is safely removed.
					DCP Midstream Partners, (NYSE DCP) traded down 0.1749% on Tuesday, reaching $35.5577. "Has $143,000 Stake in Rice Midstream Partners LP (NYSE:RMP)" was originally reported by Transcript Daily and is the sole property of of Transcript Daily. Spirit Of America Mgmt Ny holds 0.4% of its portfolio in American Midstream Partners LP (NYSE:AMID) for 190,829 shares. Bradley Foster And Sargent Ct stated it has 293,505 shares. Martin Midstream Partners L.P. Regent Investment Management LLC now holds 11,000 shares worth $141,000.Several other equities analysts have also commented on the company. Com Bank has 4,500 shares.Among 12 analysts covering CONE Midstream Partners LP (NYSE:CNNX), 8 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 4 Hold. 132.71 million shares or 1.86% more from 130.29 million shares in 2016Q3 were reported. Creative Planning reported 1.51 million shares. 1,914 are held by Carroll Financial Associates. Fin Architects Incorporated holds 0% or 89 shares. Analysts expect next quarter's EPS will be $-0.29 and the next full year EPS is anticipated to be $-0.50.As of the latest earnings report the EPS was $-1.08 and is expected to be $-1.71 for the current year with 52,319,000 shares outstanding. On average, equities research analysts predict that Rice Midstream Partners will post $1.39 EPS for the current fiscal year.Cbre Clarion Securities Llc increased Phillips 66 Partners Lp (NYSE:PSXP) stake by 10,675 shares to 108,102 valued at $5.26 million in 2016Q4. (NYSEMKT:ESTE) stake by 200,000 shares and now owns 33,970 shares. Pepsico Incorporated (NYSE:PEP) was reduced too.Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with our FREE daily email newsletter.

 

Recommended:









20 July 2017




The Norway Savings Bank Purchases 80 Shares of ConocoPhillips (COP)
				Finally, Advocacy Wealth Management Services LLC boosted its stake in shares of ConocoPhillips by 4.5% in the first quarter. This buyback authorization permits the energy producer to reacquire up to 5.3% of its shares through open market purchases.			






Juno Temple to Co-Star With Claire Foy in Steven Soderbergh's Next Movie
				A good movie called Side Effects and a great Cinemax series called The Knick were the result of this sabbatical. And in keeping with his prolific nature, he's already at work on another film after that.			








20 July 2017




Amish Couple Sentenced For Gifting Their Daughters
				Defense attorney Ryan Hyde said Kaplan was married to the oldest daughter in the family's eyes and the other children loved him. In total, the girls in the home ranged in age from 3 months to 18 years old.			








3-year-old boy hit, killed by vehicle in Spanish Fork
				A 3-year-old boy was struck and killed by a vehicle in Spanish Fork on Wednesday afternoon, according to Spanish Fork Police Lt. Spanish Fork Police officials said the death appears to be an accident, and drugs and alcohol were not factors in the case.			








20 July 2017




Yankees bolster hitting, bullpen with trade
				The move addresses a pair of New York's shortcomings while leaving the Red Sox to deal with a slightly more picked-over pool. On Tuesday night, the Yankees made a trade that should plug a few holes and help stop all that bleeding .			








20 July 2017




The Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT) Shares Bought by Norway Savings Bank
				It is negative, as 75 investors sold CAT shares while 395 reduced holdings. 89 funds opened positions while 349 raised stakes. Argus Research upgraded Caterpillar Inc. (NYSE:CAT) were released by: Nasdaq.com and their article: "Caterpillar, Inc".			










20 July 2017




Usain Bolt to run 100m and 4x100m at World Championships
				Before London, he will compete in the 100m in the Diamond League in Monaco on Friday.  I want to retire on a winning note".			








20 July 2017




Demi Lovato's 'Sorry Not Sorry' Video Features These Surprising Celebrity Cameos
				We're loving the vibe from " Sorry Not Sorry ", which is the ideal anthem for anyone who's ever been hated on.  She uses the hashtag #SNSHouseParty for her House Party promo tour. "They have exceeded my expectations".			








20 July 2017




China starts mass production of US' MQ-9 reaper rival drone
				The CH-5 comes with a simple user interface while its take-off and landing can be automated. However, the names of the potential buyers have not yet revealed by the CH-5 developers.			








Stock is unchanged at $200.14 (GD) General Dynamics to Webcast 2017…
				Following the sale, the director now directly owns 7,336 shares of the company's stock, valued at approximately $1,437,929.36. New Century Investment Mgmt has 4,100 shares for 1% of their portfolio. (NYSE:GIS) to report earnings on September, 20.			






Comprehensive Stock Analysis Of Newmont Mining Corporation (NEM)
				The total number of shares percentage held by insiders is about 0.13% while the number of Shares % held by institutions is 80.3%. The basic materials company reported $0.25 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $0.22 by $0.03.			








20 July 2017




'Fire Garpax' Billboard Goes Up in Chicago
				Not surprisingly given some Bulls' fans current state of mind, the campaign snowballed, tapping out at over $8,000 raised. According to CSN Chicago , the billboard is exactly one mile northeast of the United Center, the home of the Bulls.			





















Popular





Defending champion Stenson and Spieth paired for British Open

		Could Jordan Spieth complete the third leg of a career grand slam? As ever with the Open Championship , anything could happen.  Hatton will be competing at The Open for the sixth time having not made a cut prior since last year's edition.  
		

Wouldn't have picked Sessions if he knew of recusal plans

		Trump scolded Sessions for telling the Senate judiciary committee that he had not met with any Russians during the campaign. Earlier this week, Axios reported that Trump continued to harbor resentment against Sessions over the decision.  
		

Monster Beverage Corporation (MNST) Stake Raised by Wendell David Associates Inc

		BidaskClub raised Monster Beverage Corporation from a "hold" rating to a "buy" rating in a research report on Wednesday. Equities analysts expect that Monster Beverage Corporation will post $1.49 earnings per share for the current year.  
		

Cyberpunk sci-fi horror game, Observer, releases on August 15th - New screenshots

		After being announced past year , Observer now has a release date, and it's coming up very soon on August 15, 2017. In this game, players take the role of cyberpunk legend Rutger Hauer ( Blade Runner ) as Detective Lazarski.  
		

Woman in serious condition after water tower rescue

		There was no word on the woman's condition, but she could be seen moving around as SkyForce10 hovered above the rescue. The 59-year-old woman suffered injuries to her head, arm, neck and back and was transported to Wilmington Hospital.  
		

Featured Stock to Focus: Sears Holdings Corporation (SHLD)

		The High Revenue estimate is predicted as 4.21 Million, while the Low Revenue Estimate prediction stands at 4.21 Million. Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC boosted its position in Sears Holdings Corporation by 56.5% in the first quarter.  
		

Blake Griffin Re-Signs With Clippers

		The power forward said he wants to finish his career in a Clippers uniform. "I've never been more excited for an opportunity". The 32-year-old point guard averaged 86.2 touches per game, the eighth highest in the league.  
		

Multiple People Hit by auto  at Columbia Cemetery

		Authorities say a dozen people suffered minor injuries after a auto drove into a graveside service Wednesday at a SC cemetery. He said the man driving the vehicle was treated and police would know more about the incident after interviewing him.  
		

Missing Elyria woman found dead in a trunk, police say

		When police arrived they found the driver, 56-year-old Roy Owens, Jr., outside of his wrecked vehicle holding a knife. Monday and asked officers to do a welfare check on her sister because she couldn't reach her on the phone.  
		

MTA officials consider food ban on subway after trash track fire

		The mayor says he's spoken to Lhota about the pesky trash fires and understands it's a "real concern". The track fire started a discussion about restricting food in the subway.  
		







 


Latest






European Union  raises prospect of new sanctions against North Korea




Fast Growing Stock in Focus: Gaming and Leisure Properties, Inc. (NASDAQ:GLPI)




Patterson-UTI Energy, Inc. (NASDAQ:PTEN) Reviewed By Analysts




Police investigating Down East death as homicide




Chipotle Temporarily Closes Restaurant Following Multiple Reports Of Customer Illness




Deputy AG Rosenstein Weighs In On Mueller Hiring Clinton Donors




NCC Approves Etisalat's Name Change To 9mobile




Sookie and Michel Have a "Gilmore Girls" Reunion in Greece




Slight majority want Democrats to retake power in 2018, poll says




Analysts Set Avis Budget Group, Inc. (NASDAQ:CAR) PT at $34.00







Tendencies






Warner Bros. Officially Announces Wonder Woman Sequel




Agnico Eagle Mines Ltd (AEM) Set to Announce Quarterly Earnings on Wednesday




Justin Bieber Has Canceled the Rest of His 'Purpose' Tour Dates




THOR: RAGNAROK Official English Trailer Released




The Bachelorette spoilers: Eric Bigger, Dean Unglert, and hometown dates








 







 


American Midstream Partners LP

























Edition: 



Our Contact 



July 25 2017








Breaking News



LLC Acquires 20 Shares of Amazon.com, Inc






Gov't relaxes salt, whole grain standards for school meals










Trending Topics
KKR Pulls the Trigger on $2.8 Billion Deal for WebMD
World's first autonomous cargo ship to launch next year
Robot finds possible melted nuclear fuel inside the devastated Fukushima reactor












Digital Realty Trust Inc
Whiting Petroleum Corporation (WLL) Scheduled to Post Quarterly Earnings on Wednesday
US Home Sales Drop
Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc. (CMG) Saw a 52-Week High
BAE Systems PLC (BAESY) Reviewed By Analysts















 









Markets
Entertaiment
Industry
Science
Sport
Global News
Health Care
USA










 

Latest



FNF Group of Fidelity National (FNF) Sees 52-Week High
On August 4 Keefe Bruyette & Woods held the company rating at "Outperform" but raised the price expectation from $41.00 to $43.00. Sg Americas Securities Ltd Liability stated it has 0.04% of its portfolio in FNF Group of Fidelity National Financial, Inc .
The Maxim Integrated Products, Inc. (NASDAQ:MXIM) Releases Q1 Earnings Guidance
The firm owned 140,985 shares of the semiconductor company's stock after buying an additional 4,975 shares during the period. Evercore ISI reiterated an "in-line" rating on shares of Maxim Integrated Products in a research note on Friday, April 21st.
Kuchar aiming to come of age at British Open
However, patches of awful weather often last for only part of the day, creating different course conditions for different players. Of the first 61 players, 34 broke par , including the 62 by Brendan Steele that set a record for major championship play.
BJP will unbeatable in Rajasthan: Amit Shah
A green corridor was created to rush Jat to SMS Hospital where his condition is stated to be stable, but still critical. He was immediately attended to by senior cardiologists and necessary cardiac resuscitation was done.
Kuchar leads day two at British Open golf
That led one sympathetic golf journalist to suggest to him he must be proud that he fought back and showed true character. After two straight missed cuts in the Irish and Scottish Opens, McIlroy has a chance to win his fifth major championship.
Putin cut from 2 upcoming Hollywood movies due to hacking concerns
But Grandview Management's Jeff Silver said Russian Federation will be the hot topic for the next few years in the movie industry. Putin has dominated Russia's political landscape and greatly expanded his power during the last 17 years.
US Senate Committee May Compel Testimony From Trump Jr., Manafort on Russian Federation 
Separately, the spokesman for Trump's legal team, Mark Corallo, confirmed his resignation on Friday.  Sessions has been under siege since becoming Trump's attorney general.
Congress makes Sushil Kumar Shinde general secretary incharge of Himachal Pradesh
The party has and will always continue to utilise her experience and acumen", said party spokesperson Randeep Singh Surjewala.  She does plan to remain as an MP for the Congress, however.
Sean Spicer Weighs In On Melissa McCarthy's 'Spicey' Impersonation
There are times when it goes from amusing to mean. "Sometimes it can be amusing , Some of the memes you have to crack up about". Priebus added that they've "done a lot of things together" and Scaramucci was a "close friend".
YouTube to end support for Video Editor, Photo slideshows starting September 20
Come September, YouTube is shuttering its Video Editor and photo slideshows, Android Police reports. Also, they can get the videos from Google Takeout without any loss in the original quality.
Prince George celebrates his 4th birthday with a brand new portrait
An official picture has been released to mark the fourth birthday of Prince George - and the future king looks a happy little boy. The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge released a new portrait of their son, Prince George, to mark his fourth birthday.
Mauricio Pochettino not anxious  by big spending of Tottenham's rivals
Pochettino: "Our philosophy comes from the board, I have a very good relationship with Daniel Levy , we know what we need to do". Spurs face Paris Saint-Germain on Sunday morning in the International Champions Cup as part their United States tour.
Rory McIlroy Roars Back Following Disastrous Start To The British Open
He goes out in an all-star group with 2011 Masters champion Charl Schwartzel of South Africa and world number four Rory McIlroy . He is 45 now, but recent years have shown that age is not really a barrier to succeeding in the Open.
Lexington Realty Trust (LXP) Stake Raised by State Street Corp
The real estate investment trust reported $0.40 EPS for the quarter, beating analysts' consensus estimates of $0.36 by $0.04. The stock of Imagination Technologies Group plc (LON:IMG) earned "Buy" rating by Liberum Capital on Wednesday, October 26.
Rory McIlroy inspired by pep talk at British Open
That put him within three shots of the lead held by Matt Kuchar , a seemingly unthinkable prospect at the same point yesterday. Open in 2015 and had control of the 2016 Masters until his infamous triple bogey on the 12th hole at Augusta National.


 

Recommended



This JUSTICE LEAGUE Poster Rules Hard

Ambassador 'discussed campaign with Sessions'

Kyrie Irving Reportedly Requests Trade From Cavs

Irresistible Portrait Marks Prince George's 4th Birthday

Busch Close to Running Indy 500 But Halted By Boss Featured

Alexandria Real Estate Equities, Inc. (NYSE:ARE) Reviewed By Analysts

Sri Lanka captain Chandimal to miss first test against India

Israeli police attack Palestinian worshippers near Al-Aqsa Mosque

Derrick Rose, Cavaliers Discussing One-Year Deal

Young Justice: Season Three; "Outsiders" Adds Characters for Revival






 

Published: Sat, July 22, 2017  
Markets | By Noel Gibbs 



  American Midstream Partners LP






The value in dollars went from $557,000 to $1,445,000 increasing 159.4% since the last quarter. Many factors may come into play when trying to pick the right stocks to own. About 564,347 shares traded. Weatherford International Plc (NYSE:WFT) has risen 2.15% since July 21, 2016 and is uptrending. It has underperformed by 5.24% the S&P500. Covenant Asset Management LLC boosted its position in EQT Midstream Partners, by 5.9% in the second quarter. The business had revenue of $199.63 million during the quarter. The Company, through its subsidiaries, owns and operates electric transmission and distribution facilities, and natural gas distribution facilities. (MMP) traded up 0.14% during midday trading on Friday, reaching $70.12. Noble Midstream Partners LP (NYSE:NBLX) has 0.00% since July 21, 2016 and is.DCP Midstream Partners, LP (NYSE:DCP) - Research analysts at US Capital Advisors lowered their Q2 2017 EPS estimates for DCP Midstream Partners, in a report released on Monday. Narrowing in a bit closer, the 5 month price index is 0.86830, the 3 month is 0.95083, and the 1 month is now 1.00726. This is an increase from Magellan Midstream Partners L.P.'s previous quarterly dividend of $0.84. 19 funds opened positions while 56 raised stakes.
Alibaba Group Holding Limited
					OppenheimerFunds Inc. raised its position in shares of Alibaba Group Holding Limited by 10.4% in the first quarter. The business had revenue of $5.61 billion during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $5.26 billion.
					CenterPoint Energy, Inc.is a public utility holding company. Eagle Asset Mngmt has invested 0.04% of its portfolio in Wayside Technology Group, Inc. Findlay Park Llp owns 5.62M shares. Endurance Wealth Management accumulated 40,939 shares. Barclays Capital downgraded Enable Midstream Partners LP (NYSE:ENBL) rating on Monday, June 20. Amalgamated Fincl Bank reported 135,938 shares or 0.03% of all its holdings. Qci Asset Mgmt Ny has invested 0% in Magellan Midstream Partners, L.P. (NYSE:MMP). $400,000 worth of Magellan Midstream Partners, L.P. (NYSE:MMP) shares were sold by Selvidge Jeff R. Korner Lisa J also sold $786,700 worth of Magellan Midstream Partners, L.P. (NYSE:MMP) on Wednesday, February 8. Equities research analysts predict that EQT Midstream Partners, will post $5.60 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. Therefore 77% are positive. Finally, Morgan Stanley boosted their price target on shares of EQT Midstream Partners, from $86.00 to $87.00 and gave the stock an overweight rating in a research report on Friday, July 14th.The Q.i. Value of Terra Nitrogen Company, L.P. (NYSE:TNH) is 15.00000. The rating was upgraded by Ladenburg Thalmann to "Buy" on Thursday, July 21. The company was maintained on Wednesday, September 16 by Wunderlich. The company was maintained on Tuesday, October 25 by RBC Capital Markets. The firm earned "Buy" rating on Monday, August 10 by Argus Research. The firm's market capitalization is $706.31 million.
United Kingdom  palace releases Prince George's 4th birthday portrait
					George is third in line for the British throne, behind his father, Prince William , and his grandfather, Prince Charles. Prince George has enchanted millions worldwide with his cheeky personality and endearing expressions.
					Among 23 analysts covering Comcast Corporation (NASDAQ:CMCSA), 19 have Buy rating, 0 Sell and 4 Hold. Therefore 83% are positive. The MF Rank of EnLink Midstream Partners, LP (NYSE:ENLK) is 9365. They set a hold rating and a $73.00 target price on the stock. The firm has "Buy" rating given on Thursday, August 18 by Stifel Nicolaus. Donald Smith & Company Inc acquired 566,381 shares as Korea Electric Power Corp (KEP)'s stock rose 7.41%. The rating was upgraded by SunTrust to "Buy" on Wednesday, September 30. The formula is calculated by looking at companies that have a high earnings yield as well as a high return on invested capital. The company was maintained on Thursday, July 13 by Stifel Nicolaus. Evercore reinitiated the stock with "Buy" rating in Monday, November 30 report.Another recent and important Post Holdings Inc (NYSE:POST) news was published by Globenewswire.com which published an article titled: "Post Holdings Completes Acquisition of Weetabix" on July 03, 2017.
State jobless rate improves in June
					Those new numbers show that the sunshine state's June jobless rate was 4.1 percent, down two-tenths of a percent from May.  Monroe County's 2.8 percent was the lowest in the state, while Hendry County has the highest rate at 9.4 percent.
					Analysts await Comcast Corporation (NASDAQ:CMCSA) to report earnings on July, 27 before the open. During the same period in the prior year, the firm earned $0.36 earnings per share. CMCSA's profit will be $2.29B for 20.61 P/E if the $0.48 EPS becomes a reality. After having $0.33 EPS previously, Shell Midstream Partners LP's analysts see -3.03% EPS growth.

 

Like this:

Anthony Scaramucci blows the press a smooch

British Open Leaderboard: Jordan Spieth and Brooks Koepka Race to the Top

After Spicer Resigns, Can White House's Press Relations Be Rescued?

CDC: 1 person dead, 25 infected after Salmonella outbreak

Kyrie Irving Wants Out of Cleveland

Newcastle sign defender Manquillo from Atletico

Sessions Discussed The 2016 Campaign With Russian Ambassador

Manafort, Trump Jr. to Be Interviewed, Won't Testify at Senate Hearing

Petroleo Brasileiro SA - Petrobras (PBR) now  has a weekly volatility of 2.11%

Lydia Ko makes great escape at Marathon Classic on LPGA Tour

Froome on course for fourth title despite rival's gain

Nitish Kumar in town, meets Rahul Gandhi, attends PM Modi's dinner

Prince George marks 4th birthday with new photo

Republicans' Obamacare repeal plan 'axes insurance for 32m'

AU Optronics Corp (NYSE:AUO) Shares Bought by Aperio Group LLC








Related News


Share














LLC Acquires 20 Shares of Amazon.com, Inc





KKR Pulls the Trigger on $2.8 Billion Deal for WebMD





World's first autonomous cargo ship to launch next year





Robot finds possible melted nuclear fuel inside the devastated Fukushima reactor




 
 



 

 
 

     
   
 



    Copyright ©  JoshnAijaBlog, All Rights Reserved  , feedback@joshnaijablog.com         

  

 








DCP Midstream, LLC And DCP Midstream Partners, LP Combine To Form The Largest NGL Producer And Gas Processor In The U.S. With An Enterprise Value Of $11 Billion, And Announces Multiple New Growth Projects - TheStreet




































































 

 




















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 








































DCP Midstream, LLC And DCP Midstream Partners, LP Combine To Form The Largest NGL Producer And Gas Processor In The U.S. With An Enterprise Value Of $11 Billion, And Announces Multiple New Growth Projects






GlobeNewswire



Jan 4, 2017 6:30 AM EST













 




























































 DENVER, Jan. 04, 2017 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- DCP Midstream, LLC (Midstream), a 50/50 joint venture between Phillips 66 and Spectra Energy (Owners), and DCP Midstream Partners, LP (NYSE:DPM), today announced that they have signed and closed a transaction combining all of the assets and debt of Midstream with DPM (Transaction), simplifying the corporate structure and creating the largest natural gas liquids (NGL) producer and gas processor in the United States. On January 23, 2017, the combined company will be renamed DCP Midstream, LP and the New York Stock Exchange stock ticker symbol will be changed to "DCP".  Transaction Summary Under terms of the Transaction, Midstream has contributed subsidiaries owning all of its assets to DPM, plus $424 million of cash, in exchange for approximately 31.1 million DPM units ($1.125 billion) and DPM assuming $3.15 billion of Midstream debt, for an estimated transaction multiple of approximately eight times based on current commodity strip prices. The cash proceeds of $424 million contributed to DPM will be used to repay its revolver, fund its growth projects or prefund repayment of DPM debt maturing in December 2017. The Owners have retained their 50/50 joint ownership of DCP Midstream, LLC, which owns the incentive distribution rights (IDRs) and 38 percent of the outstanding DPM general and limited partner units. The terms of the Transaction were unanimously approved by the Board of Directors of DCP Midstream and DCP Midstream Partners based on the unanimous approval and recommendation of the Conflicts Committee, which is comprised of independent directors. "This transformational transaction provides a platform of premier assets with strong growth opportunities in the key U.S. producing basins at a multiple that paves the way towards future distribution growth," said Wouter van Kempen, chairman, president and CEO of both DCP Midstream and DCP Midstream Partners. "The transaction benefits both our unitholders and our Owners with a simplified structure and is the logical progression following our successful DCP 2020 strategy execution to date. We've added fee-based margins, sold non-core assets, strengthened Midstream's balance sheet and reset the overall cost structure of the DCP enterprise to make the assets more MLP-friendly."  



 








 










































If you liked this article you might like













8 Stocks Spiking on Unusual Volume
These stocks rising on unusual volume are within range of triggering big breakouts. Here's how to trade them from here.



Roberto Pedone

Sep 8, 2016 8:14 AM EDT
























For Energy MLPs, It's All About That Basin
Operators in the Permian and Marcellus/Utica have the best prospects while those in the Haynesville, Barnett and Eagle Ford are the most challenged, CreditSights says in a report.



Claire Poole

Jun 17, 2016 9:05 AM EDT
























Ex-Dividend Alert: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: GPP, ARLP, DPM
GPP ARLP DPM are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Wednesday, November 04, 2015



TheStreet Wire

Nov 3, 2015 10:00 AM EST
























Analysts Are Pumped About Four Oil and Gas Companies This Quarter
Third-quarter earnings season is getting underway, leaving analysts speculating about how exploration and production companies will continue to perform as oil prices remain low.



Sarah Pringle

Oct 22, 2015 1:59 PM EDT








































 











Trending


Walmart in Focus Amid 'Horrific' Human Trafficking Incident in Texas That Causes Nine Deaths


Trump Just Resurrected the Ugly Practice Known as Civil Forfeiture for No Reason


We Must All Stop Blindly Trusting in the Apple iPhone - It Could Also Be Viciously Hacked


10 Stocks to Give as Gifts


Earnings Are Back With a Vengeance: Cramer's 'Mad Money' Recap (Monday 7/24/17)











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 































Dcp Midstream Partners, Lp - DCP - Stock Price Today - Zacks









 




























 


Free Gift
	for Zacks.com visitors
 

		DCP is up 0.06% today, but where's it headed in August?
 


   

 Privacy Policy

		No cost, no obligation to buy anything ever.
 


















 
Join

Sign In




Member Sign In


 Keep Me Signed In 
What does "Remember Me" do?
Forgot Password


Create a New Account







 




















 


You are being directed to ZacksTrade, a division of LBMZ Securities and licensed broker-dealer. ZacksTrade and Zacks.com are separate companies. The web link between the two companies is not a solicitation or offer to invest in a particular security or type of security. ZacksTrade does not endorse or adopt any particular investment strategy, any analyst opinion/rating/report or any approach to evaluating indiv idual securities.
If you wish to go to ZacksTrade, click OK. If you do not, click Cancel.
OK Cancel








Back to top








more

























 DCP Midstream Partners, LP (DCP)
(Delayed Data from NYSE)



$34.57 USD
34.57
294,986


                +0.02                (0.06%)
              

Updated Jul 24, 2017 04:01 PM ET




Add to portfolio
 





Zacks Rank:



                                                 5-Strong Sell         5 




Style Scores:



C Value | D Growth | F Momentum | F VGM                


The Style Scores are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style. 
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.


Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A


Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores





Industry Rank:



 Bottom 29%(189 out of 265) 
Industry: Oil and Gas - Production and Pipelines




View All Zacks #1 Ranked Stocks




Trades from
$1

 



This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%


 Zacks Rank Education - Learn about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to fully access the Zacks Rank


The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports



The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
        Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank
        









Quote Overview
















Stock Activity



Open
34.84


Day Low
34.15


Day High
34.98


52 Wk Low
29.70


52 Wk High
42.45


Avg. Volume
321,066


Market Cap
4.95 B


Dividend
3.12 ( 9.03%)


Beta
2.10





Key Earnings Data



Earnings ESP 
21.43%


Most Accurate Est
0.17


Current Qtr Est
0.14


Current Yr Est
1.08


Exp Earnings Date
*BMO8/7/17


Prior Year EPS
1.37


Exp EPS Growth (3-5yr)NA


Forward PE
31.89


PEG Ratio
NA










Oils-Energy » Oil and Gas - Production and Pipelines



*BMO = Before Market Open *AMC = After Market Close


Zacks Earnings ESP (Expected Surprise Prediction) looks to find companies that have recently seen positive earnings estimate revision activity. The idea is that more recent information is, generally speaking, more accurate and can be a better predictor of the future, which can give investors an advantage in earnings season.
The technique has proven to be very useful for finding positive surprises. In fact, when combining a Zacks Rank #3 or better and a positive Earnings ESP, stocks produced a positive surprise 70% of the time, while they also saw 28.3% annual returns on average, according to our 10 year backtest.
    
Visit the Earnings ESP Center
See the Full List of Stocks To Beat Earnings





Research Report for DCP



All Zacks’ Analyst Reports



News for DCP

Zacks News for DCP
Other News for DCP



New Strong Sell Stocks for July 20th
07/20/17-10:08AM EST  Zacks

Targa Prices Equity Offering to Fund $1.3B Pipeline Project
05/30/17-7:59AM EST  Zacks

DCP: What are Zacks experts saying now?

Zacks Private Portfolio Services

Oil Stocks to Watch for Earnings on May 10: SEP, DCP & More
05/09/17-7:31AM EST  Zacks

New Strong Sell Stocks for April 26th
04/26/17-9:20AM EST  Zacks

Kinder Morgan, DCP Midstream Ink LOI for Pipeline Development
04/12/17-8:38AM EST  Zacks


More Zacks News for DCP




DCP Midstream Announces Quarterly Distribution
07/24/17-4:15PM EST  GlobeNewswire

What to Expect from EnLink Midstream Partners` 2Q17 Volumes
07/24/17-9:45AM EST  Market Realist

What Will Drive EnLink Midstream Partners` 2Q17 EBITDA?
07/24/17-6:45AM EST  Market Realist

DCP Midstream declares $0.78 dividend
07/24/17-3:48AM EST  Seeking Alpha

What Analysts Recommend for Western Gas ahead of 2Q17 Results
07/20/17-6:45AM EST  Market Realist


More Other News for DCP





Premium Research for DCP





Zacks Rank


 Strong Sell 5



Zacks Industry Rank
 Bottom 29%(189 out of 265)


Zacks Sector Rank
 Bottom 0% (16  out of 16) 



Style Scores

C Value | D Growth | F Momentum | F VGM




Earnings ESP


21.43%



Research Report for DCP

Snapshot





This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%



Zacks Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - All Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to get access to the Zacks Rank


The Style Scores  are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style.
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.



Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A



Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank



The Zacks Sector Rank assigns a rating to each of the 16 Sectors based on their average Zacks Rank.
A sector with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
Zacks Sector Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank 
The sector with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top sector (1 out of 16), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Sectors. The sector with the worst average Zacks Rank (16 out of 16) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank 
Zacks Sector Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank



The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports


Zacks Earnings ESP (Expected Surprise Prediction) looks to find companies that have recently seen positive earnings estimate revision activity. The idea is that more recent information is, generally speaking, more accurate and can be a better predictor of the future, which can give investors an advantage in earnings season.
The technique has proven to be very useful for finding positive surprises. In fact, when combining a Zacks Rank #3 or better and a positive Earnings ESP, stocks produced a positive surprise 70% of the time, while they also saw 28.3% annual returns on average, according to our 10 year backtest.
    
Visit the Earnings ESP Center
See the Full List of Stocks To Beat Earnings


This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%



Zacks Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - All Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to fully access the Zacks Rank


The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank



The Zacks Sector Rank assigns a rating to each of the 16 Sectors based on their average Zacks Rank.
A sector with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
Zacks Sector Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank 
The sector with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top sector (1 out of 16), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Sectors. The sector with the worst average Zacks Rank (16 out of 16) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank 
Zacks Sector Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank



The Style Scores are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style. 
The three scores are based on the trading styles of Growth, Value, and Momentum.


Growth Score
A


Value Score
A


Momentum Score
A


Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Style Scores  are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style.
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.



Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A



Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports

(  = Change in last 30 days) 
View All Zacks Rank #1 Strong Buys





Premium Research: Industry Analysis



Top Peers
Symbol
Zacks Rank




DCP Midstream Partners, LP
DCP



Pembina Pipeline Corp.
PBA



Plains Group Holdings, L.P.
PAGP



TransCanada Corporation
TRP



Western Gas Partners, LP
WES



Semgroup Corporation
SEMG



Arc Logistic Partners LP
ARCX




See all Oil and Gas - Production and Pipelines Peers


 








Price and EPS Surprise Chart














1 Month
3 Months
YTD





Interactive Chart | Fundmental Chart



Billion Dollar Secret



Company Summary
DCP Midstream Partners, LP is a midstream master limited partnership that gathers, treats, compresses, processes, transports and markets natural gas and transports and markets natural gas liquids. DCP Midstream Partners, LP is managed by its general partner, DCP Midstream GP, LLC, which is wholly owned by Duke Energy Field Services, a joint venture between Duke Energy and ConocoPhillips. It is a midstream master limited partnership formed by Duke Energy Field Services to own, operate, acquire and develop a diversified portfolio of complementary midstream assets. Supported by its relationship with Duke Energy Field Services and its parents, Duke Energy and ConocoPhillips, it intend to acquire and construct additional assets and have a management team dedicated to executing our growth strategies.   

















 




















	DCP Midstream - Business Segments

















































Business Segments






Company > Business Segments
We are a must-run sector that gathers, compresses, treats, processes, transports, stores, and sells natural gas, as well as produces, fractionates, transports, stores and sells natural gas liquids and recovers and sells condensate, and transports, stores and sells propane in wholesale markets.
 
DCP Midstream Stats
YTD December 2016 Volumes
Gathered and Processed - 6.5 TBtu/d
Natural Gas Liquids - 400 MBbls/d

Assets
61 Plants/Treaters, 12 Fractionators
64,300 miles of pipeline

The DCP Footprint
































  DPM Stock Quote - DCP Midstream LP - Bloomberg Markets              

       



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  DCP Midstream LP   DPM:US      Ticker Change   DPM:US has changed to a new ticker symbol   USD             Volume   0    Previous Close   37.60                  


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Volume   0    Previous Close   37.60    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   -    Market Cap (USD)   -    Shares Outstanding   -    Price/Sales (TTM)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -        Sector Energy   % Price Change -0.30%     Industry Energy   % Price Change -0.30%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   DCP Midstream, LP operates as a natural gas processing company. The Company gathers, processes, transports, markets, and stores natural gas and natural gas liquids. DCP Midstream offers its services in the United States.    Address  370 17th StreetSuite 2500Denver, CO 80202United States   Phone  1-303-595-3331   Website   www.dcpmidstream.com     Executives Board Members    Wouter T Van Kempen  Chairman/President/CEO    Sean P O'Brien  VP/CFO    Jerry Barnhill  Group VP/Chief EHS Officer      Bill Johnson   Group VP/Chief Tranformation Ofcr    Tamara Bray  Group VP/Chief HR Ofcr     Show More         


DCP Midstream Partners - Wikipedia





















 






DCP Midstream Partners

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search








This page is a new unreviewed article. This template should be removed once the page has been reviewed by someone other than its creator; if necessary the page should be appropriately tagged for cleanup. (October 2016)



DCP Midstream Partners, LP


Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: DPM


Industry
Petroleum industry


Founded
2005


Products
Midstream services


Revenue
 US$1.9 Billion (2015)[1]



Operating income

 US$0.1 Billion (2015)[1]



Net income

 US$0.2 Billion (2015)[1]


Total assets
 US$5.5 Billion (2015)[1]


Total equity
 US$2.8 Billion (2015)[1]



Number of employees

628 (2016)[2]


Website
www.dcpmidstream.com


DCP Midstream Partners, LP is a Fortune 1000 midstream petroleum services company headquartered in Denver, Colorado. As a publicly traded partnership, the company does not have directors, officers, or employees itself, but relies on its General Partner for managing its operations.[3] With a total economic value of more than US$6 billion, and 628 employees providing support, the company is one of the largest midstream petroleum services company in the United States.[4]
See also[edit]

List of oilfield service companies

References[edit]


^ a b c d e "Financial Statements for DCP Midstream - Morningstar". Morningstar.com. 2015-12-31. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "2015 Annual Report". 2015-12-31. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "Fortune 1000 List". Fortune. Time. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "2015 Annual Report". DCP. DCP. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 






 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=DCP_Midstream_Partners&oldid=756369666"					
Categories: Companies established in 2005Companies based in Denver2005 establishments in ColoradoHidden categories: Unreviewed new articles from October 2016All unreviewed new articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 23 December 2016, at 19:35.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









DCP Midstream Partners - Wikipedia





















 






DCP Midstream Partners

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search








This page is a new unreviewed article. This template should be removed once the page has been reviewed by someone other than its creator; if necessary the page should be appropriately tagged for cleanup. (October 2016)



DCP Midstream Partners, LP


Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: DPM


Industry
Petroleum industry


Founded
2005


Products
Midstream services


Revenue
 US$1.9 Billion (2015)[1]



Operating income

 US$0.1 Billion (2015)[1]



Net income

 US$0.2 Billion (2015)[1]


Total assets
 US$5.5 Billion (2015)[1]


Total equity
 US$2.8 Billion (2015)[1]



Number of employees

628 (2016)[2]


Website
www.dcpmidstream.com


DCP Midstream Partners, LP is a Fortune 1000 midstream petroleum services company headquartered in Denver, Colorado. As a publicly traded partnership, the company does not have directors, officers, or employees itself, but relies on its General Partner for managing its operations.[3] With a total economic value of more than US$6 billion, and 628 employees providing support, the company is one of the largest midstream petroleum services company in the United States.[4]
See also[edit]

List of oilfield service companies

References[edit]


^ a b c d e "Financial Statements for DCP Midstream - Morningstar". Morningstar.com. 2015-12-31. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "2015 Annual Report". 2015-12-31. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "Fortune 1000 List". Fortune. Time. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "2015 Annual Report". DCP. DCP. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 






 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=DCP_Midstream_Partners&oldid=756369666"					
Categories: Companies established in 2005Companies based in Denver2005 establishments in ColoradoHidden categories: Unreviewed new articles from October 2016All unreviewed new articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 23 December 2016, at 19:35.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.






















	DCP Midstream - Home























































Committed to our Communities




Committed to our Investors




COMMITTED to DCP 2020




COMMITTED to operational excellence




COMMITTED to our people








 AT DCP MIDSTREAM,
WE ARE AN ENERGY COMPANY THAT CONNECTS RESOURCES TO END-USE MARKETS. WE LEVERAGE OUR STRATEGIC FOOTPRINT OF ASSETS AND ARE A LEADING FULL-SERVICE MIDSTREAM LOGISTICS PROVIDER.






CompanyIndustry-leading footprint of integrated natural gas gathering and processing and downstream assets.
LEARN MORE





Investors
Executive Management, Board of Directors, events, and presentations.
LEARN MORE





Safety & Sustainability
Committed to operating reliably and safely.
LEARN MORE





Careers
Essential to the country’s energy needs.
LEARN MORE













IN THE NEWSAir Force pilot from Franktown named FOX31 Hero of the Month

READ STORY







CareersGet to know our culture and learn more about our competitive benefits.

Join Us







Explore DCP's FootprintView our assets with our interactive map.

Explore Map








Midstream 101Learn the industry basics and our role in it.

Start Here

































DCP Midstream Partners - Wikipedia





















 






DCP Midstream Partners

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search








This page is a new unreviewed article. This template should be removed once the page has been reviewed by someone other than its creator; if necessary the page should be appropriately tagged for cleanup. (October 2016)



DCP Midstream Partners, LP


Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: DPM


Industry
Petroleum industry


Founded
2005


Products
Midstream services


Revenue
 US$1.9 Billion (2015)[1]



Operating income

 US$0.1 Billion (2015)[1]



Net income

 US$0.2 Billion (2015)[1]


Total assets
 US$5.5 Billion (2015)[1]


Total equity
 US$2.8 Billion (2015)[1]



Number of employees

628 (2016)[2]


Website
www.dcpmidstream.com


DCP Midstream Partners, LP is a Fortune 1000 midstream petroleum services company headquartered in Denver, Colorado. As a publicly traded partnership, the company does not have directors, officers, or employees itself, but relies on its General Partner for managing its operations.[3] With a total economic value of more than US$6 billion, and 628 employees providing support, the company is one of the largest midstream petroleum services company in the United States.[4]
See also[edit]

List of oilfield service companies

References[edit]


^ a b c d e "Financial Statements for DCP Midstream - Morningstar". Morningstar.com. 2015-12-31. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "2015 Annual Report". 2015-12-31. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "Fortune 1000 List". Fortune. Time. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "2015 Annual Report". DCP. DCP. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 






 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=DCP_Midstream_Partners&oldid=756369666"					
Categories: Companies established in 2005Companies based in Denver2005 establishments in ColoradoHidden categories: Unreviewed new articles from October 2016All unreviewed new articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 23 December 2016, at 19:35.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 







需要安全验证




Facebook加入或登录 Facebook   邮箱或手机号密码忘记帐户？登录想加入 Facebook 吗？注册注册安全验证码请输入以下文本看不清楚上面的文字？换一个或播放语音验证信息框中文字：这是什么？安全验证这是一个标准的安全测试，用于阻止垃圾邮件制造者创建假帐户并向用户发送垃圾信息。提交中文(简体)English (US)日本語한국어Français (France)Bahasa IndonesiaPolskiEspañolPortuguês (Brasil)DeutschItalianoMessengerFacebook Lite用户地点游戏位置名人二手市场小组食谱彩色气球Instagram公司简介创建广告创建主页开发者招聘信息隐私权政策Cookie广告选项条款设置活动日志 Facebook © 2017





DCP Midstream Partners - Wikipedia





















 






DCP Midstream Partners

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search








This page is a new unreviewed article. This template should be removed once the page has been reviewed by someone other than its creator; if necessary the page should be appropriately tagged for cleanup. (October 2016)



DCP Midstream Partners, LP


Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: DPM


Industry
Petroleum industry


Founded
2005


Products
Midstream services


Revenue
 US$1.9 Billion (2015)[1]



Operating income

 US$0.1 Billion (2015)[1]



Net income

 US$0.2 Billion (2015)[1]


Total assets
 US$5.5 Billion (2015)[1]


Total equity
 US$2.8 Billion (2015)[1]



Number of employees

628 (2016)[2]


Website
www.dcpmidstream.com


DCP Midstream Partners, LP is a Fortune 1000 midstream petroleum services company headquartered in Denver, Colorado. As a publicly traded partnership, the company does not have directors, officers, or employees itself, but relies on its General Partner for managing its operations.[3] With a total economic value of more than US$6 billion, and 628 employees providing support, the company is one of the largest midstream petroleum services company in the United States.[4]
See also[edit]

List of oilfield service companies

References[edit]


^ a b c d e "Financial Statements for DCP Midstream - Morningstar". Morningstar.com. 2015-12-31. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "2015 Annual Report". 2015-12-31. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "Fortune 1000 List". Fortune. Time. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 
^ "2015 Annual Report". DCP. DCP. Retrieved 2016-10-31. 






 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=DCP_Midstream_Partners&oldid=756369666"					
Categories: Companies established in 2005Companies based in Denver2005 establishments in ColoradoHidden categories: Unreviewed new articles from October 2016All unreviewed new articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 23 December 2016, at 19:35.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






